Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 4 Pupils

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Education Code of 1969,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1970).

For comment on Goss v. Lopez, 419 U.S. 565, 95 S. Ct. 729, 42 L. Ed. 2d 725, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 23 (1975), and particularly its effect in Wyoming, see X Land & Water L. Rev. 607 (1975).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 238 to 310.

Conditions at school as excusing or justifying nonattendance, 9 ALR4th 122.

Validity of regulation of athletic eligibility of students voluntarily transferring from one school to another, 15 ALR4th 885.

79 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 697 to 806.